Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1210
Licensed pump installation supervisor, defined.

Licensed pump installation supervisor means any individual who has obtained a license from the department and who is engaged in the installation of pumps and pumping equipment or the decommissioning of water wells. Such supervisor may have discretionary and supervisory authority over other employees of a pump installation contractor.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1151.